Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201818-2117.03
Redevelopment project; inclusion of certain costs.

A redevelopment project that includes the division of taxes as provided in section 18-2147 shall not provide for the reimbursement of costs incurred prior to approval of the redevelopment project, except for costs relating to:

(1) The preparation of materials and applications related to the redevelopment project;

(2) The preparation of a cost-benefit analysis conducted pursuant to section 18-2113;

(3) The preparation of a redevelopment contract;

(4) The preparation of bond and other financing instruments;

(5) Land acquisition and related due diligence activities, including, but not limited to, surveys and environmental studies; and

(6) Site demolition and preparation.

Laws 2018, LB874, § 17.
July 19, 2018